Illinois, session 104th, HB5503.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 522-28 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-28 new)7    Sec. 22-28. Adult Workforce High School Diploma Program.8    (a) In this Section:9    "Academic skill intake assessment" means a 10criterion-referenced assessment of numeracy and literacy 11skills with high reliability and validity as determined by 12third-party research, which may be administered in person or 13online.14    "Adult Workforce High School Diploma Program" or "Program" 15means the Program established under this Section.16    "Approved Program provider" means an eligible Program 17provider that applies to participate in the Program, is 18approved by the Board to administer the Program, and agrees to 19meet all Program requirements.20    "Average cost per graduate" means the average cost per 21graduate calculated in accordance with subsection (f).22    "Board" means the Illinois Community College Board.23    "Cohort" means all students who enter the Program between   HB5503- 2 -LRB104 20646 LNS 34143 b1July 1 and June 30 of each Program year.2    "Eligible student" means a person ineligible for 3reenrollment under subsection (b) of Section 26-2 and 34 CFR 4300.102 who resides in this State, has not attained a high 5school diploma or its recognized equivalent, who requires 10 6units of credit or less to graduate under the requirements of 7Sections 27-605, 27-610, and 27-615.8    "Employability skills certification" means a certificate 9earned by demonstrating professional nontechnical skills 10through assessment and includes, but is not limited to, the 11program standards of the United States Department of Labor's 12Skills to Pay the Bills: Mastering Soft Skills for Workplace 13Success program.14    "Graduation rate" means the graduation rate calculated in 15accordance with subsection (g).16    "Measurement period" means the 2-year period beginning 17July 1 of the year the cohort begins through June 30 of the 18subsequent fiscal year.19    "Milestones" means measures of student progress for which 20funds are disbursed to an approved Program provider.21    "Program funding" means funding received by an approved 22Program provider.23    "Program year" means the period beginning on July 1 of 24each year and ending on June 30 of the following year.25    "Transcript evaluation" means a documented summary of 26credits earned in a previous public or nonpublic, accredited   HB5503- 3 -LRB104 20646 LNS 34143 b1high school compared with this State's requirements to earn a 2high school diploma.3    "Workforce credential" means a third-party credential that 4either (i) is a part of a sequence of credentials that can be 5accumulated over time to build an individual's qualifications 6to advance along a career pathway and results in a certificate 7or (ii) verifies an individual's qualifications or competence 8and is issued by a third party with the relevant authority to 9issue the credential.10    (b) The Board shall establish an outcome-based Adult 11Workforce High School Diploma Program to allow an eligible 12student to qualify for enrollment in the Program, and, upon 13successful completion of the Program, to be awarded a high 14school diploma.15    (c) The Board shall approve Program providers to 16administer the Program as follows:17        (1) not later than August 15 of each year, the Board 18    shall make available an application for third-party 19    entities to apply to become an approved Program provider;20        (2) not later than September 15 of each year, the 21    Board shall review applications, approve Program providers 22    that meet the requirements set forth in this Section, and 23    make available a list of approved Program providers on the 24    Board's public website; and25        (3) an approved Program provider shall be authorized 26    to begin enrolling eligible students upon being approved   HB5503- 4 -LRB104 20646 LNS 34143 b1    by the Board as an approved Program provider.2    (d) An approved Program provider shall:3        (1) be accredited by:4            (A) the Board of Higher Education;5            (B) the Higher Learning Commission; or6            (C) holding an active accreditation from one of 7        the 7 United States regional accreditors, including:8                (i) the Middle States Commission on Higher 9            Education;10                (ii) the New England Association of Schools 11            and Colleges;12                (iii) the Higher Learning Commission;13                (iv) the Northwest Commission on Colleges and 14            Universities;15                (v) the Southern Association of Colleges and 16            Schools Commission on Colleges;17                (vi) the Accrediting Commission for Schools, 18            Western Association of Schools and Colleges;19                (vii) the Accrediting Commission for Community 20            and Junior Colleges; or21                (viii) any successor entities or 22            consolidations of the above, including Cognia.23        (2) offer the following to an eligible student at no 24    cost:25            (A) an academic skill intake assessment and 26        transcript evaluation;  HB5503- 5 -LRB104 20646 LNS 34143 b1            (B) a documented plan that includes the 2        requirements for the student to complete the Program 3        and earn a high school diploma;4            (C) remedial education services in numeracy and 5        literacy;6            (D) a course catalog that includes all courses 7        necessary to earn a high school diploma;8            (E) one or more programs through which the student 9        can earn a workforce credential;10            (F) one or more programs through which the student 11        can earn an employability skills certification;12            (G) one or more courses that help the student 13        enter or advance within a specific occupation or 14        occupational cluster; and15            (H) all courses necessary to meet the requirements 16        to earn a high school diploma.17    (e) An approved Program provider must meet the following 18standards for each cohort at the conclusion of each cohort 19measurement period:20        (1) have a graduation rate of not less than 50% 21    beginning with the second program cohort; and22        (2) have an average cost per graduate of not more than 23    $7,500.24    If an approved Program provider fails to meet the 25standards under paragraphs (1) and (2), the Board shall place 26the approved Program provider on probationary status for the   HB5503- 6 -LRB104 20646 LNS 34143 b1remainder of the Program year. If an approved Program provider 2fails to meet the standards under paragraphs (1) and (2) by the 3end of the subsequent Program year, the approved Program 4provider may no longer be an approved Program provider.5    (f) The average cost per graduate shall be calculated by 6dividing the total Program funding disbursed to an approved 7Program provider for a cohort during the period from the 8beginning of the cohort through the end of the measurement 9period by the total number of students in that cohort who 10earned a high school diploma during the measurement period.11    (g) The graduation rate shall be calculated by dividing 12the number of students in a cohort who earned a high school 13diploma during the measurement period by the number of 14students in the cohort for which an approved Program provider 15has received Program funding.16    (h) Subject to appropriation, the Board is authorized to 17retain 2% of Program funds for administrative costs and 18disburse any remaining funds appropriated by the General 19Assembly to approved Program providers based on milestones 20reached by students in amounts not to exceed:21        (1) for the completion of each half unit of high 22    school credit if such credit is required to earn a high 23    school diploma, $275;24        (2) for each employability skills certification earned 25    by a student, $275;26        (3) for each workforce credential earned by a student   HB5503- 7 -LRB104 20646 LNS 34143 b1    if the credential requires not more than 50 hours of 2    training, $275;3        (4) for each workforce credential earned by a student 4    if the credential requires more than 50 but not more than 5    100 hours of training, $550;6        (5) for each workforce credential earned by a student 7    if the credential requires more than 100 hours of 8    training, $825; or9        (6) for each high school diploma earned by a student, 10    $1,100.11    In order to receive the funds provided for in this 12subsection, an approved Program provider shall, no later than 13the tenth day of each month, submit to the Board a report that 14includes all milestones met by students in the previous month. 15An approved Program provider shall report the number of 16enrolled students for whom invoices have been submitted and 17the number of enrolled students for whom invoices have not 18been submitted in the monthly invoices submitted under this 19subsection. The Board shall pay approved Program providers in 20the order in which invoices are received until all available 21moneys are exhausted.22    The Board shall provide a written update to the approved 23Program providers on or before the last calendar day of each 24month that includes all of the following:25        (A) the aggregate total dollars that have been paid to 26    approved Program providers to date;  HB5503- 8 -LRB104 20646 LNS 34143 b1        (B) the aggregate number of enrolled students in this 2    State for whom an invoice has been submitted; and3        (C) the aggregate number of enrolled students in this 4    State for whom an invoice has not been submitted.5    (i) Funds received by an approved Program provider under 6this Section shall be used for providing and preparing for 7instruction, instructional materials, and support services for 8students, including coaching and mentoring. The funds shall 9not be used to build or expand brick-and-mortar 10infrastructure.11    (j) An approved Program provider may not require or accept 12any financial payments from a student enrolled in the program.13    (k) In 2027 and each year thereafter, no later than August 1415, each approved Program provider shall submit a report to 15the Board that includes:16        (1) the number of eligible students participating in 17    the Program;18        (2) the number of units of high school credit earned 19    by the students;20        (3) the number of employability skills certificates 21    earned by the students;22        (4) the number of workforce credentials earned by the 23    students; and24        (5) the number of students who earned a high school 25    diploma through participation in the Program.26    (l) Beginning in 2027, no later than December 1 of each   HB5503- 9 -LRB104 20646 LNS 34143 b1year, the Board shall provide the Governor and the General 2Assembly a report that includes:3        (1) the information reported to the Board under 4    subsection (k);5        (2) the amount of funds disbursed to each approved 6    Program provider and the milestones for which the funding 7    was disbursed;8        (3) the graduation rate for each approved Program 9    provider; and10        (4) the average cost per graduate for each approved 11    Program provider.12    (m) This Section is repealed on June 30, 2030.